District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.102

Repealed

Foreign corporations — Change of corporate name.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 220, ch. 269, § 102
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-933c.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.3.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.102.